Utah statutes.
10-8-47.5.   Knives regulated by state.

(1)  As used in this section, "knife" means a cutting instrument that includes a sharpened or pointed blade.

(2)  The authority to regulate a knife is reserved to the state except where the Legislature specifically delegates responsibility to a municipality.

(3) (a)  Unless specifically authorized by the Legislature or, subject to Subsection (3)(b), a municipal ordinance with a criminal penalty, a municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance or a regulation pertaining to a knife.

(b)  A municipality may not enact an ordinance with a criminal penalty pertaining to a knife that is:

(i)  more restrictive than a state criminal penalty pertaining to a knife; or

(ii)  has a greater criminal penalty than a state penalty pertaining to a knife.

